Utah statutes.
63A-5-601.   Legislative findings and policy.

(1)  The Legislature finds the following:

(a)  The operation of facilities owned and controlled by the state consumes significant amounts of energy.

(b)  Facilities owned and controlled by the state present a significant opportunity for energy cost savings through the implementation of conservation measures.

(c)  Principles which produce efficient facility management in the private sector are equally applicable to the management of public buildings and facilities.

(d)  There exists, in the private sector, favorable alternative methods of financing energy conservation measures which are not readily adaptable to financing state facility energy efficiency improvements due to current budgetary practices.

(e)  Maximization of energy conservation efforts in light of limited resources requires careful advance planning by responsible agencies.

(2)  The Legislature declares that it is the policy of the state to:

(a)  undertake aggressive programs designed to reduce energy use in state facilities in order to reduce the operating costs of state government and to set an example of energy efficiency for the public;

(b)  utilize, to the greatest practical extent, alternative funding sources and methods of financing energy efficiency improvements in state facilities in a manner which minimizes the necessity for increased appropriations;

(c)  employ private sector management incentive principles, to the extent practicable, to implement the policies in Subsections (2)(a) and (b);

(d)  develop incentives to encourage state entities to conserve energy, reduce energy costs, and utilize renewable energy sources where practicable; and

(e)  procure and use energy efficient products where practicable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 334, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

